Washington statutes.
RCW 19.188.030

Library access policies.

The legislature finds that, as a matter of public health and safety, access by minors to violent videos and violent video games is the responsibility of parents and guardians.

Public libraries, with the exception of university, college, and community college libraries, shall establish policies on minors' access to violent videos and violent video games. Libraries shall make their policies known to the public in their communities.

Each library system shall formulate its own policies, and may, in its discretion, include public hearings, consultation with community networks as defined under chapter 70.190 RCW, or consultation with the Washington library association in the development of its policies.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 806.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.